Washington statutes.
RCW 36.73.110

Acceptance and use of gifts and grants.

A district may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations.

[ 2005 c 336 s 10; 1987 c 327 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 336: See note following RCW 36.73.015.